Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1880.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4912 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 4912. Impersonating a public servant.A person commits a misdemeanor of the [second] first degree if he falsely pretends to hold a position in the public service with intent to induce another to submit to such pretended official authority or otherwise to act in reliance upon that pretense to his prejudice.Section 2. Title 18 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5518. Identity concealment by Federal immigration official.123456789101112131415161718 (a) General rule.--A Federal immigration official may not, either intentionally or unintentionally, conceal the official's face with a mask or other article or device while performing the official's duties.(b) Exemptions.--The offense defined under subsection (a) shall not apply to a:(1) Federal immigration official engaged in an undercover assignment.(2) Federal immigration official wearing a mask that is designed to protect against exposure to smoke or other airborne particles during a state of emergency related to a natural disaster.(3) Law enforcement officer wearing a medical grade mask designed to prevent the transmission of airborne diseases during a state of emergency related to a disaster emergency.(c) Civil penalty.--A Federal immigration official who violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of $5,000 per violation.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Federal immigration official." An officer, employee or person otherwise paid by, or acting as an agent of:(1) The United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, including any division of the office.(2) The United States Customs and Border Protection, including any division of the office.(3) The United States and is charged with immigration enforcement."Immigration enforcement." As follows:20250HB1880PN2340 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) An effort to investigate, enforce or assist in the investigation or enforcement of a Federal civil immigration law.(2) The term includes an effort to investigate, enforce or assist in the investigation or enforcement of a Federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person's presence in, entry or reentry to or employment in the United States, including a violation of 8 U.S.C. § 1253 (relating to penalties related to removal), 1324c (relating to penalties for document fraud), 1325 (relating to improper entry by alien) or 1326 (relating to reentry of removed aliens).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1880PN2340 - 3 - 123456789101112